Arkansas, session 2025, HB1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-4-803(c), concerning exemptions from the
laws concerning the expenditure of cash funds, is amended to read as follows
to repeal obsolete language and make stylistic changes:
(c) The Arkansas Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool, created under
the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, § 23-79-501 et seq., and its
board of directors, and the Arkansas Property and Casualty Insurance Guaranty
Fund and its advisory association, referenced under the Arkansas Property and
Casualty Insurance Guaranty Act, § 23-90-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Life
and Health Insurance Guaranty Association and its board of directors,
referenced under the Arkansas Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association
Act, § 23-96-101 et seq., are hereby exempt from the provisions of this
subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-922(b)(2), concerning the State
Insurance Department Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows to repeal
obsolete language:
*JLL003*
01/31/2025 10:14:11 AM JLL003

HB1359
(2) The fund shall be used:
(A) To defray the expenses of the State Insurance
Department in the discharge of its administrative and regulatory powers and
duties as prescribed by law and as set out in the State Insurance Department
Trust Fund Act, § 23-61-701 et seq.; and
(B) To defray the administrative expenses and losses
incurred by the Arkansas Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool of the
Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, § 23-79-501 et seq., or its
successor; and
(C) To fund capital expenditures and training for fire
departments certified by the Division of Emergency Management.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.







01/31/2025 10:14:11 AM JLL003